Florida, session 2026, SB720.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âPresent subsections (4) through (13) of section 11 1009.21, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 12 through (14), respectively, and a new subsection (4) is added to 13 that section, to read: 14 1009.21âDetermination of resident status for tuition 15 purposes.âStudents shall be classified as residents or 16 nonresidents for the purpose of assessing tuition in 17 postsecondary educational programs offered by charter technical 18 career centers or career centers operated by school districts, 19 in Florida College System institutions, and in state 20 universities. 21 (4)âAn individual may not lose his or her resident status 22 for tuition purposes solely by reason of incarceration in a 23 state or federal correctional facility in this state. 24 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.